Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 759.425 is amended to read:
759.425. (1) For purposes of this  section, “retail telecommunications service” does not
include radio communications service, radio paging service, commercial mobile  radio service,
personal communications service or cellular communications service.
[(1)] (2)(a) The Public Utility Commission shall establish and  implement a competitively neutral
and nondiscriminatory universal service fund. [ Subject to  subsection (6) of this section, ] Except as
provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection,  the Public Utility Commission shall use the uni-
versal service fund to ensure basic  telephone service is available at a reasonable and affordable
rate. The Public Utility Commission may adopt rules to conform the universal service fund  to sec-
tion 254 of the federal Telecommunications Act of 1996 (Public  Law 104-104), and to related [ rules]
regulations adopted by the Federal Communications Commission, to the extent that  the Public
Utility Commission determines conforming the rules  is appropriate. [ The commission  may delay
implementation for rural telecommunications carriers, as  defined in the federal Act, for up to six
months after the date the Federal Communications Commission adopts a cost methodology  for rural
carriers.]
(b) In addition to using the universal service fund to ensure basic telephone  service, the
Public Utility Commission may use the universal service fund to encourage broadband  ser-
vice availability and to provide support to telecommunications carriers that provide both
basic telephone service and broadband service.
[(2)(a)] (3)(a) The Public Utility Commission shall establish the price a telecommunications
utility may charge its customers for basic telephone  service. The commission [ in its discretion ] shall
periodically review and  evaluate the status of telecommunications services in the state and desig-
nate the services included in basic telephone service.  The commission [ in its discretion ] shall peri-
odically review and adjust  as necessary the price a telecommunications utility may charge for basic
telephone  service.
(b) The provisions of this subsection  do not apply to the basic telephone service provided by a
telecommunications utility described in ORS 759.040.
[(3)(a)] (4)(a) The [ Public Utility ] commission shall establish a benchmark for basic telephone
service as necessary for the  administration and distribution of the universal service fund. The
universal service fund shall provide explicit support to an eligible telecommunications carrier that
is equal to the difference between the cost of providing  basic telephone service and the benchmark,
Enrolled House Bill 2091 (HB 2091-A) Page 1
less any explicit  compensation received by the  telecommunications  carrier from federal sources
specifically  [ targeted to recovery of ] used to recover  local loop costs and less any explicit support
received by the telecommunications carrier from a federal universal service program.
(b) The commission  [in its discretion ] shall periodically review the benchmark established under
paragraph (a) of this subsection  and adjust [ it] the benchmark as necessary to reflect:
(A) Changes in competition in the telecommunications industry;
(B) Changes in federal universal service support; and
(C) Other relevant factors as determined by the commission.
(c) Except for a telecommunications utility described in  ORS 759.040, the commission shall seek
to limit the difference between the  price a telecommunications utility may charge for basic tele-
phone service and the benchmark.
[(4)] (5) [ Except as provided in subsections (7) and (8) of this section, ] There is imposed on the
sale of all retail telecommunications services sold in  this state a universal service surcharge. Unless
otherwise provided by the  [ Public Utility ] commission by rule, the universal service  surcharge
[shall] must be a uniform percentage of the sale of retail telecommunications services in an  amount
sufficient to support the [ purpose] purposes of the  universal service fund established under sub-
section (2)  of this section, provided that the percentage does not exceed 8.5 percent of the
sale of retail telecommunications  services . The  universal service  surcharge may be [ shown]
listed as a separate line item by all telecommunications carriers [ using language ], as  prescribed by
the commission by rule or order . A telecommunications carrier shall [ deposit] transmit amounts
collected [ into the universal service fund according to ] pursuant to this  section to the commission
in accordance with a schedule  adopted by the commission. The commission shall deposit moneys
transmitted to the commission pursuant to this subsection in the universal  service fund es-
tablished under subsection (2) of this section.
[(5)] (6) [ The Public Utility Commission is authorized to establish a universal service fund, ] The
universal service fund established under subsection (2) of this section is  separate and  distinct
from the General Fund. The universal service fund shall consist of all universal service surcharge
moneys collected by telecommunications carriers and [ paid into ] transmitted to  the commission
for deposit in the universal service fund. The  universal service  fund [ shall] may be  used only for
the [ purpose] purposes  described in this section[ ,] and for payment of expenses  incurred by the
commission or a third party appointed by the commission to  administer this section. All moneys in
the universal service fund are continuously appropriated to the commission to  carry out the pro-
visions of this section. Interest on moneys deposited in the universal service fund  shall accrue to
the universal service  fund.
[(6) In addition to the purpose specified in subsection (1) of  this section, moneys in the universal
service fund may be used by the Public  Utility Commission to survey or map the state to determine
where adequate broadband services are available. The amount of moneys in the  universal service fund
used for  this purpose may not exceed the amount the state is required to expend to receive the maximum
amount of funds available from federal sources for broadband services. If in-kind services  are allowed
for a state’s share of a mapping project, the  state shall use in-kind services before expending universal
service funds. The commission may use an independent contractor to perform mapping services. ]
[(7) For purposes of this section, “retail telecommunications service” does not include radio com-
munications service, radio paging service, commercial  mobile radio service, personal communications
service or cellular communications service. ]
[(8)(a) Notwithstanding subsection  (7) of this section, a person who primarily provides radio com-
munications service, radio paging service, commercial  mobile radio service, personal communications
service or cellular  communications service may request designation as an eligible telecommunications
carrier by the Public Utility Commission for purposes of participation in the universal service fund. ]
[(b) In the event a person who primarily provides radio communications  service, radio paging
service, commercial mobile radio service, personal communications service or  cellular communications
service seeks  designation as an eligible telecommunications carrier for purposes of participation in the
universal service fund, the person shall  provide written notice to the Public Utility Commission re-
Enrolled House Bill 2091 (HB 2091-A) Page 2
questing designation as an eligible telecommunications carrier within 60 days of the  date the commis-
sion establishes the fund. Upon receiving notice, the commission may designate the person as an eligible
telecommunications carrier for purposes of participation in the fund. ]
[(c) A  person who primarily provides radio communications service, radio paging service, com-
mercial mobile radio service, personal communications service or  cellular communications service who
fails to request designation as an eligible telecommunications carrier within 60  days of the date the
universal service fund is established by the Public Utility  Commission may not be designated as an
eligible telecommunications carrier unless the person has contributed to  the fund for at least one year
immediately prior to requesting designation. ]
(7) A person that primarily provides radio communications service, radio paging  service,
commercial mobile  radio service, personal communications service or cellular communi-
cations service  may request designation as an eligible telecommunications carrier by the
commission for purposes of this section if the person imposes the universal service  sur-
charge described in subsection (5) of this section and transmits  the moneys collected to the
commission for deposit in the universal service fund established under subsection (2) of this
section for at least one year immediately prior to requesting the designation.
[(9)] (8)  A pay telephone provider may apply to the [ Public Utility ] commission, on a form  de-
veloped by the commission, for a refund of the universal service surcharge  imposed on the pay
telephone provider under subsection [ (4)] (5) of this section for the provision of pay telephone ser-
vice.
SECTION 2.
This 2017 Act  takes effect on the 91st day after the date on which the 2017
regular session of the Seventy-ninth Legislative Assembly adjourns sine die.
Passed by House March 14, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 2, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2091 (HB 2091-A) Page 3